Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 State-wide Probation System
42-8-34.
Sentencing hearings and determinations; presentence investigations; payment of fees, fines, and costs; post-conviction, presentence bond; continuing jurisdiction; transferal of probation supervision.

Any court of this state which has original jurisdiction of criminal actions, except municipal courts and probate courts, in which the defendant in a criminal case has been found guilty upon verdict or plea or has been sentenced upon a plea of nolo contendere, except for an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment, may, at a time to be determined by the court, hear and determine the question of the probation of such defendant.

Prior to the sentencing hearing, the court may refer the case to an officer of the circuit in which the court is located for investigation and recommendation. The court, upon such reference, shall direct an officer to make an investigation and to report to the court, in writing at a specified time, upon the circumstances of the offense and the criminal record, social history, and present condition of the defendant, together with the officer’s recommendation; and it shall be the duty of such officer to carry out the directive of the court.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-1 and subsection (f) of Code Section 17-10-3, if it appears to the court upon a hearing of the matter that the defendant is not likely to engage in a criminal course of conduct and that the ends of justice and the welfare of society do not require that the defendant shall presently suffer the penalty imposed by law, the court in its discretion shall impose sentence upon the defendant but may stay and suspend the execution of the sentence or any portion thereof or may place him or her on probation under the supervision and control of the officer for the duration of the sentence. The period of probation or suspension shall not exceed the maximum sentence of confinement which could be imposed on the defendant.

In every case that a court of this state or any other state sentences a defendant to probation or any pretrial release or diversion program under the supervision of DCS, in addition to any fine or order of restitution imposed by the court, there shall be imposed a probation fee as a condition of probation, release, or diversion in the amount equivalent to $23.00 per each month under supervision, and in addition, a one-time fee of $50.00 if such defendant was convicted of any felony. The probation fee may be waived or amended after administrative process by DCS and approval of the court, or upon determination by the court, as to the undue hardship, inability to pay, or any other extenuating factors which prohibit collection of the fee; provided, however, that the imposition of sanctions for failure to pay fees shall be within the discretion of the court through judicial process or hearings. Probation fees shall be waived on probationers incarcerated or detained in a Department of Corrections or other confinement facility which prohibits employment for wages. All probation fees collected by DCS shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury, except as provided in subsection (f) of Code Section 17-15-13, relating to sums to be paid into the Georgia Crime Victims Emergency Fund. Any fees collected by the court under this paragraph shall be remitted not later than the last day of the month after such fee is collected to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

In addition to any other provision of law, any person convicted of a violation of Code Section 40-6-391 or subsection (b) of Code Section 16-13-2 who is sentenced to probation or a suspended sentence by a municipal, magistrate, probate, recorder’s, mayor’s, state, or superior court shall also be required by the court to pay a one-time fee of $25.00. The clerk of court, or if there is no clerk the person designated to collect fines, fees, and forfeitures for such court, shall collect such fee and remit the same not later than the last day of the month after such fee is collected to the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

In addition to any fine, fee, restitution, or other amount ordered, the sentencing court may also impose as a condition of probation for felony criminal defendants sentenced to a day reporting center an additional charge, not to exceed $10.00 per day for each day such defendant is required to report to a day reporting center; provided, however, that no fee shall be imposed or collected if the defendant is unemployed or has been found indigent by the sentencing court. The charges required by this paragraph shall be paid by the probationer directly to DCS. Funds collected by DCS pursuant to this subsection shall only be used by DCS in the maintenance and operation of the day reporting center program.

The court may, in its discretion, require the payment of a fine, fees, or restitution as a condition of probation. Chapter 14 of Title 17 shall control when determining the amount of restitution. When probation supervision is required, the court may require the payment of a probation supervision fee as a condition of probation. In determining the financial obligations, other than restitution, to impose on the defendant, the court may consider:

The defendant’s financial resources and other assets, including whether any such asset is jointly controlled;

The defendant’s earnings and other income;

The defendant’s financial obligations, including obligations to dependents;

The period of time during which the probation order will be in effect;

The goal of the punishment being imposed; and

Any other factor the court deems appropriate.

The court may convert fines, statutory surcharges, and probation supervision fees to community service or educational advancement on the same basis as it allows a defendant to pay a fine through community service or educational advancement as set forth in subsection (d) of Code Section 17-10-1.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Developmental disability” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 37-1-1.

“Indigent” means an individual who earns less than 100 percent of the federal poverty guidelines unless there is evidence that the individual has other resources that might reasonably be used without undue hardship for such individual or his or her dependents.

“Significant financial hardship” means a reasonable probability that an individual will be unable to satisfy his or her financial obligations for two or more consecutive months.

“Totally and permanently disabled” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 49-4-80.

The court shall waive, modify, or convert fines, statutory surcharges, probation supervision fees, and any other moneys assessed by the court or a provider of probation services upon a determination by the court prior to or subsequent to sentencing that a defendant has a significant financial hardship or inability to pay or that there are any other extenuating factors which prohibit payment or collection; provided, however, that the imposition of sanctions for failure to pay such sums shall be within the discretion of the court through judicial process or hearings.

Unless rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that a defendant will be able to satisfy his or her financial obligations without undue hardship to the defendant or his or her dependents, a defendant shall be presumed to have a significant financial hardship if he or she:

Has a developmental disability;

Is totally and permanently disabled;

Is indigent; or

Has been released from confinement within the preceding 12 months and was incarcerated for more than 30 days before his or her release.

During the interval between the conviction or plea and the hearing to determine the question of probation, the court may, in its discretion, either order the confinement of the defendant without bond or may permit his or her release on bond, which bond shall be conditioned on his appearance at the hearing and shall be subject to the same rules as govern appearance bonds. Any time served in confinement shall be considered a part of the sentence of the defendant.

The sentencing judge shall not lose jurisdiction over any person placed on probation during the term of the person’s probated sentence. The judge is empowered to revoke any or all of the probated sentence, rescind any or all of the sentence, or, in any manner deemed advisable by the judge, modify or change the probated sentence, including ordering the probationer into the sentencing options system, as provided in Article 6 of Chapter 3 of this title, at any time during the period of time prescribed for the probated sentence to run. In addition, when the judge is considering revoking a probated sentence in order to require the defendant to enter a drug court division, mental health court division, family treatment court division, or veterans court division and the length of the original sentence is insufficient to authorize such revocation, the defendant may voluntarily agree to an extension of his or her original sentence within the maximum sentence allowed by law, notwithstanding subsection (f) of Code Section 17-10-1. Such extension shall be for a period not to exceed three years, and upon completion of such specific court division program, the court may modify the terms of probation in accordance with subparagraph (a)(5)(A) of Code Section 17-10-1.

If a defendant is placed on probation in a county of a judicial circuit other than the one in which such defendant resides for committing any misdemeanor offense, such defendant may, when specifically ordered by the court, have probation supervision transferred to the judicial circuit of the county in which the defendant resides.

History.

Code 1933, § 27-2702; Ga. L. 1939, p. 285, § 4; Ga. L. 1941, p. 481, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 352, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 8; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 8; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1148, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1136, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 988, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 381, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 840, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1271, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1643, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 42; Ga. L. 2001, p. 94, § 6; Ga. L. 2004, p. 775, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, Ex. Sess., p. ES3, § 26/HB1EX; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 42/HB 95; Ga. L. 2009, p. 124, § 1/HB 344; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-4/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-7/SB 174; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-12/SB 407.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), deleted “juvenile courts,” following “criminal actions, except” and deleted a comma following “municipal courts” near the middle; in subsection (b), in the first sentence, inserted “sentencing” near the beginning, and substituted “an officer” for “the probation supervisor”, in the second sentence, substituted “an officer” for “the supervisor” near the middle, substituted “officer’s recommendation” for “supervisor’s recommendation”, and substituted “such officer” for “the supervisor” near the end; inserted “or her” in the first sentence of subsections (c) and (f); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” near the end and substituted “the sentence” for “such probation” at the end; substituted “DCS” for “the department” throughout paragraph (d)(1); and, in paragraph (d)(1), substituted “if such defendant” for “where such defendant” near the end of the first sentence, and substituted “Department of Corrections” for “departmental” in the third sentence; substituted “condition of probation” for “condition precedent to probation” in subsection (e); in subsection (g), substituted “Article 6 of Chapter 3 of this title” for “Article 9 of this chapter” near the end of the second sentence and added the third and fourth sentences; in subsection (h), substituted “If a defendant” for “Notwithstanding any provision of this Code or any rule or regulation to the contrary, if a defendant” at the beginning, substituted “such defendant resides” for “he resides” in the middle, deleted “his” preceding “probation supervision”, and substituted “the defendant” for “he” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted “family treatment court division,” near the middle of the third sentence of subsection (g).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “(e) The court may, in its discretion, require the payment of a fine or costs, or both, as a condition of probation.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, inserted “or educational advancement” twice in paragraph (e)(2).

Cross references.

Sentence and punishment generally, T. 17, C. 10.

Abandonment of child generally, T. 19, C. 10.

Suspension of sentence in abandonment cases, §

19-10-1(j)

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 1271, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by this Act shall apply with respect to sentences entered on or after that July 1, 1999.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 94, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2001 Crime Prevention Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2009, p. 124, § 2/HB 344, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to persons convicted on or after July 1, 2009.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Georgia’s Probation Laws,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 255 (1970).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 47 (2001).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

42-8-34.1.
Revocation of probated or suspended sentence; alternative sentencing; burden of proof; length of probation supervision.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “special condition of probation or suspension of the sentence” means a condition of a probated or suspended sentence which:

Is expressly imposed as part of the sentence in addition to general conditions of probation and court ordered fines and fees; and

Is identified in writing in the sentence as a condition the violation of which authorizes the court to revoke the probation or suspension and require the defendant to serve up to the balance of the sentence in confinement.

A court may not revoke any part of any probated or suspended sentence unless the defendant admits the violation as alleged or unless the evidence produced at the revocation hearing establishes by a preponderance of the evidence the violation or violations alleged.

At any revocation hearing, upon proof that the defendant has violated any general provision of probation or suspension other than by commission of a new felony offense, the court shall consider the use of alternatives to include community service, probation detention centers, special alternative incarceration, or any other alternative to confinement deemed appropriate by the court or as provided by the state or county. In the event the court determines that the defendant does not meet the criteria for such alternatives, the court may revoke the balance of probation or not more than two years in confinement, whichever is less.

If the violation of probation or suspension alleged and proven by a preponderance of the evidence or the defendant’s admission is the commission of a felony offense, the court may revoke no more than the lesser of the balance of probation or the maximum time of the sentence authorized to be imposed for the felony offense constituting the violation of the probation. For purposes of this Code section, the term “felony offense” means:

A felony offense;

A misdemeanor offense committed in another state on or after July 1, 2010, the elements of which are proven by a preponderance of evidence showing that such offense would constitute a felony if the act had been committed in this state; or

A misdemeanor offense committed in another state on or after July 1, 2010, that is admitted to by the defendant who also admits that such offense would be a felony if the act had been committed in this state.

If the violation of probation or suspension alleged and proven by a preponderance of the evidence or the defendant’s admission is the violation of a special condition of probation or suspension of the sentence, the court may revoke the probation or suspension of the sentence and require the defendant to serve the balance or portion of the balance of the original sentence in confinement.

The payment of restitution or reparation, costs, or fines ordered by the court may be payable in one lump sum or in periodic payments, as determined by the court after consideration of all the facts and circumstances of the case and of the defendant’s ability to pay. Such payments shall, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, be made either to the clerk of the sentencing court or, if the sentencing court is a probate court, state court, or superior court, to the DCS office serving such court.

In no event shall an offender be supervised on probation for more than a total of two years for any one offense or series of offenses arising out of the same transaction, whether before or after confinement, except as provided by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-1 and subsection (g) of Code Section 42-8-34.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-34.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1911, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 855, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 94, § 7; Ga. L. 2010, p. 318, § 1/HB 329; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-5/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (c), deleted “intensive probation,” following “community service,” in the first sentence, and substituted “such alternatives” for “said alternatives” in the second sentence; substituted “the DCS office serving such” for “the probation office serving said” near the end of the last sentence in subsection (f); and added “and subsection (g) of Code Section 42-8-34” at the end of subsection (g). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “diversion centers,” following “community service,” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 94, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2001 Crime Prevention Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 amendment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 287 (1989).

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 47 (2001).

For annual survey of criminal law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-34.2.
Delinquency of defendant in payment of fines, costs, or restitution or reparation; costs of garnishment.

In the event that a defendant is delinquent in the payment of fines, costs, or restitution or reparation, as was ordered by the court as a condition of probation, the defendant’s officer shall be authorized, but shall not be required, to execute a sworn affidavit wherein the amount of arrearage is set out. In addition, the affidavit shall contain a succinct statement as to what efforts DCS has made in trying to collect the delinquent amount. The affidavit shall then be submitted to the sentencing court for approval. Upon signature and approval of the court, such arrearage shall then be collectable through issuance of a writ of fieri facias by the clerk of the sentencing court; and DCS may enforce such collection through any judicial or other process or procedure which may be used by the holder of a writ of execution arising from a civil action.

This Code section provides the state with remedies in addition to all other remedies provided for by law; and nothing in this Code section shall preclude the use of any other or additional remedy in any case.

No clerk of any court shall be authorized to require any deposit of cost or any other filing or service fee as a condition to the filing of a garnishment action or other action or proceeding authorized under this Code section. In any such action or proceeding, however, the clerk of the court in which the action is filed shall deduct and retain all proper court costs from any funds paid into the treasury of the court, prior to any other disbursement of such funds so paid into court.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-34.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1331, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1051, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “the defendant’s officer shall be authorized, but shall not be required” for “the defendant’s probation officer is authorized, but not required” in the first sentence, substituted “DCS” for “the department” in the second and fourth sentences, and substituted “such arrearage” for “said arrearage” in the fourth sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1331, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section shall apply with respect to sentences entered prior to July 1, 1990, as well as sentences entered on or after July 1, 1990.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-35.
Terms and conditions of probation; supervision.

The court shall determine the terms and conditions of probation and may provide that the probationer shall:

Avoid injurious and vicious habits;

Avoid persons or places of disreputable or harmful character;

Report to the officer as directed;

Permit the officer to visit the probationer at the probationer’s home or elsewhere;

Work faithfully at suitable employment insofar as may be possible;

Remain within a specified location; provided, however, that the court shall not banish a probationer to any area within this state:

That does not consist of at least one entire judicial circuit as described by Code Section 15-6-1; or

In which any service or program in which the probationer must participate as a condition of probation is not available;

Make reparation or restitution to any aggrieved person for the damage or loss caused by the probationer’s offense, in an amount to be determined by the court. Unless otherwise provided by law, no reparation or restitution to any aggrieved person for the damage or loss caused by the probationer’s offense shall be made if the amount is in dispute unless the same has been adjudicated;

Make reparation or restitution as reimbursement to a municipality or county for the payment for medical care furnished the person while incarcerated pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 4 of this title. No reparation or restitution to a local governmental unit for the provision of medical care shall be made if the amount is in dispute unless the same has been adjudicated;

Repay the costs incurred by any municipality or county for wrongful actions by an inmate covered under the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 42-4-71;

Support the probationer’s legal dependents to the best of the probationer’s ability;

Violate no local, state, or federal laws and be of general good behavior;

If permitted to move or travel to another state, agree to waive extradition from any jurisdiction where the probationer may be found and not contest any effort by any jurisdiction to return the probationer to this state;

Submit to evaluations and testing relating to rehabilitation and participate in and successfully complete rehabilitative programming as directed by DCS;

Wear a device capable of tracking the location of the probationer by means including electronic surveillance or global positioning satellite systems. DCS shall assess and collect fees from the probationer for such monitoring at levels set by regulation of the Board of Community Supervision;

Complete a residential or nonresidential program for substance abuse or mental health treatment as indicated by a risk and needs assessment;

Agree to the imposition of graduated sanctions when, in the discretion of the officer, the probationer’s behavior warrants a graduated sanction; and

Pay for the cost of drug screening. DCS shall assess and collect fees from the probationer for such screening at levels set by regulation of the Board of Community Supervision.

In determining the terms and conditions of probation for a probationer who has been convicted of a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor or dangerous sexual offense as those terms are defined in Code Section 42-1-12, the court may provide that the probationer shall be:

Prohibited from entering or remaining present at a victim’s school, place of employment, place of residence, or other specified place at times when a victim is present or from loitering in areas where minors congregate, child care facilities, churches, or schools as those terms are defined in Code Section 42-1-12;

Required, either in person or through remote monitoring, to allow viewing and recording of the probationer’s incoming and outgoing email, history of websites visited and content accessed, and other internet based communication;

Required to have periodic unannounced inspections of the contents of the probationer’s computer or any other device with internet access, including the retrieval and copying of all data from the computer or device and any internal or external storage or portable media and the removal of such information, computer, device, or medium; and

Prohibited from seeking election to a local board of education.

The supervision provided for under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be conducted by an officer, law enforcement officer, or computer information technology specialist working under the supervision of an officer or law enforcement agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 10; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 11A; Ga. L. 1965, p. 413, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2125, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2942, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 761, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 775, § 4; Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 25/HB 1059; Ga. L. 2006, p. 425, § 1/HB 692; Ga. L. 2008, p. 810, § 5/SB 474; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-8/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 18/HB 349; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 42/HB 497.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(12), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(13), and added paragraphs (a)(14) through (a)(16); and, in subsection (b), deleted former paragraph (b)(2), which read: “Required to wear a device capable of tracking the location of the probationer by means including electronic surveillance or global positioning systems. The department shall assess and collect fees from the probationer for such monitoring at levels set by regulation by the department;”, redesignated former paragraphs (b)(3) through (b)(5) as present paragraphs (b)(2) through (b)(4), respectively, and inserted a comma following “Internet access” in paragraph (b)(3). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(15); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(16); and added paragraph (a)(17). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” in paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(16); substituted “officer” for “supervisor” in paragraph (a)(4); substituted “this state” for “the state” in the introductory paragraph of (a)(6); substituted “DCS” for “the department” and “The department” in paragraphs (a)(13) and (a)(14); substituted “of the Board of Community Supervision” for “by the department” in paragraph (a)(14); in paragraph (a)(17), in the second sentence, substituted “DCS” for “The Department of Corrections” and substituted “Board of Community Supervision” for “Department of Corrections”; and substituted “an officer” for “a probation officer” twice in subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “email” for “e-mail” in paragraph (b)(2); and substituted “internet” for “Internet” in paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3).

Cross references.

Prohibition against possession of firearms by convicted felons, §

16-11-131

.

Payment of fine as condition to probation for felony conviction, §

17-10-8

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, paragraph (8), as added by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2942, was redesignated as paragraph (b)(9) and the following paragraphs were redesignated accordingly, and “42-4-71” was substituted for “42-4-51” in present paragraph (b)(9).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 761, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that the safety of the public is a paramount concern and that prison and jail overcrowding and the high cost of incarceration demand a cost effective and innovative approach to protecting communities from dangerous offenders while at the same time providing alternatives to, or bridges to and from incarceration. Under appropriate conditions and limitations, electronic monitoring devices provide the criminal justice system with a tool that should be considered under proper circumstances. Electronic monitoring devices offer effective means to track individuals and may reduce criminal recidivism as well as provide the state with monetary savings since the cost of an electronic monitoring device is far less than the cost of incarcerating an individual and an individual may be able to pay for the device. The criminal penalties provided by this Act are designed to encourage the use of electronic monitoring devices while at the same time discourage interference with these devices.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 21/HB 349, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2013, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2013, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Georgia’s Probation Laws,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 255 (1970).

For note, “Limitations Upon Trial Court Discretion in Imposing Conditions of Probation,” see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 466 (1974).

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 310 (1992).

For note, “ ‘158-County Banishment’ in Georgia: Constitutional Implications under the State Constitution and the Federal Right to Travel,” see 36 Ga. L. Rev. 1083 (2002).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 11 (2006).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article, “Appeal and Error: Appeal or Certiorari by State in Criminal Cases,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 17 (2013).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-35.1.
Probation boot camp unit as special alternative incarceration.

Notwithstanding any other terms or conditions of probation which may be imposed, a court may provide that probationers sentenced for felony offenses to a period of time of not less than one year on probation as a condition of probation shall satisfactorily complete a program of confinement in a special alternative incarceration—probation boot camp unit of the Department of Corrections for a period of 120 days computed from the time of initial confinement in the unit; provided, however, that the Department of Corrections may release the defendant upon service of 90 days in recognition of excellent behavior.

Before a court may place such condition upon the sentence, an initial investigation shall be completed by the officer which indicates that the probationer is qualified for such treatment in that the individual does not appear to be physically or mentally disabled in a way that would prevent him or her from strenuous physical activity, that the individual has no obvious contagious diseases, that the individual is not less than 17 years of age nor more than 30 years of age at the time of sentencing, and that the Department of Corrections has granted provisional approval of the placement of the individual in the special alternative incarceration—probation boot camp unit.

In every case when an individual is sentenced under the terms of this Code section, the sentencing court shall, within its probation order, direct the Department of Corrections to arrange with the sheriff’s office in the county of incarceration to have the individual delivered to a designated unit of the Department of Corrections within a specific date not more than 15 days after the issuance of such probation order by the court.

At any time during the individual’s confinement in the unit, but at least five days prior to his or her expected date of release, the Department of Corrections shall certify to the trial court as to whether the individual has satisfactorily completed the condition of probation provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

Upon the receipt of a satisfactory report of performance in the program from the Department of Corrections, the trial court shall release the individual from confinement in the special alternative incarceration—probation boot camp unit. However, the receipt of an unsatisfactory report shall be grounds for revocation of the probated sentence as would any other violation of a condition or term of probation.

The satisfactory report of performance in the program from the Department of Corrections shall, in addition to the other requirements specified in this Code section, require participation of the individual confined in the unit in such adult education courses necessary to attain the equivalency of a grade five competency level as established by the State Board of Education for elementary schools. Those individuals who are mentally disabled as determined by initial testing shall be exempt from mandatory participation. After the individual is released from the unit, it shall be a special condition of probation that the individual participate in an education program in the community until grade five level competency is achieved or active probation supervision terminates. It shall be the duty of the Department of Corrections to certify to the trial court that such individual has satisfactorily completed such condition of probation while on active probation supervision. The receipt of an unsatisfactory report may be grounds for revocation of the probated sentence as would any other violation of a condition or term of probation. Under certain circumstances, the probationer may be exempt from this requirement if it is determined by the officer that community education resources are inaccessible to the probationer.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1097, § 1; Code 1981, §

42-8-35.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1097, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1984, p. 446, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 654, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1751, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 444, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1664, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Corrections” for “department” throughout; in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “Notwithstanding any other terms or conditions of probation which may be imposed, a court may provide” for “In addition to any other terms or conditions of probation provided for under this chapter, the trial judge may provide”, deleted “committed on or after July 1, 1993,” following “felony offenses”, substituted “probation shall” for “probation must”, and substituted “that the Department of Corrections” for “the department”; in subsection (b), substituted “court may place such condition upon the sentence, an initial investigation shall be completed by the officer which indicates” for “court can place this condition upon the sentence, an initial investigation will be completed by the probation officer which will indicate” near the beginning, and inserted “or her” and in subsection (d); substituted “when an individual” for “where an individual” near the beginning of subsection (c); substituted “the condition of probation provided in subsection (a) of this Code section” for “this condition of probation” in subsection (d); substituted “report shall” for “report will” in the second sentence of subsection (e); in subsection (f), substituted “testing shall be exempt” for “testing are exempt” in the second sentence, substituted “such condition” for “this condition” near the middle of the fourth sentence, and deleted “probation” preceding “officer” in the last sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 2283, § 2 also enacted a Code Section 42-8-35.1, which was redesignated as Code Section 42-8-35.2 by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 161 (1992).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).